test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_laavu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - láávu: # ok LAAVU
    láávu+N+Sg+Nom:  lááṿu
    láávu+N+Sg+Gen:  láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Acc:  láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Ill:  lááṿun
    láávu+N+Sg+Loc:  láávust
    láávu+N+Sg+Com:  láávoin
    láávu+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊvuttáá
    láávu+N+Ess:  láávvun
    láávu+N+Par:  láávvud
    láávu+N+Pl+Nom:  láávuh
    láávu+N+Pl+Gen:  [láávui, láˊvui]
    láávu+N+Pl+Acc:  láávuid
    láávu+N+Pl+Ill:  láávoid
    láávu+N+Pl+Loc:  láávuin
    láávu+N+Pl+Com:  láˊvuiguin
    láávu+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊvuittáá

  Noun - ááŋu: # ok LAAVU ááŋu:ááŋ7%^RCu 
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Nom:  ááŋ̣u
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááŋu
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááŋu
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááŋ̣un
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááŋust
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Com:  ááŋoin
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊŋuttáá
    ááŋu+N+Ess:  ááŋŋun
    ááŋu+N+Par:  ááŋŋud
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááŋuh
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááŋui, áˊŋui]
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááŋuid
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Ill:  ááŋoid
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááŋuin
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊŋuiguin
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊŋuittáá


  Noun - ráávhu: # ok LAAVU
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Nom:  ráávhu
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávhu
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávhu
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávhun
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávhust
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Com:  rávhoin
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊvhuttáá
    ráávhu+N+Ess:  ráávhun
    ráávhu+N+Par:  ráávhud
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávhuh
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Gen:  [ráávhui, ráˊvhui]
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávhuid
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Ill:  rávhoid
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávhuin
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊvhuiguin
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊvhuittáá

  Noun - táálu+v1: # ok
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  tááḷu 
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  táálu
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  táálu
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  tááḷun
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  táálust
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  tááloin
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  táˊluttáá
    táálu+v1+N+Ess:  táállun
    táálu+v1+N+Par:  táállud
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  tááluh
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [táálui, táˊlui]
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  tááluid
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  tááloid
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  tááluin
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  táˊluiguin
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  táˊluittáá

  Noun - náálu: # ok LAAVU
    náálu+N+Sg+Nom:  nááḷu
    náálu+N+Sg+Gen:  náálu
    náálu+N+Sg+Acc:  náálu
    náálu+N+Sg+Ill:  nááḷun
    náálu+N+Sg+Loc:  náálust
    náálu+N+Sg+Com:  nááloin
    náálu+N+Sg+Abe:  náˊluttáá
    náálu+N+Ess:  náállun
    náálu+N+Par:  náállud
    náálu+N+Pl+Nom:  nááluh
    náálu+N+Pl+Gen: [náálui, náˊlui]
    náálu+N+Pl+Acc:  nááluid
    náálu+N+Pl+Ill:  nááloid
    náálu+N+Pl+Loc:  nááluin
    náálu+N+Pl+Com:  náˊluiguin
    náálu+N+Pl+Abe:  náˊluittáá

  Noun - stáálu+v1: # ok; LAAVU gč láátu. Mo bargat?
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  stááḷu
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  stáálu
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  stáálu
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  stááḷun
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  stáálust
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  stááloin
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  stáˊluttáá
    stáálu+v1+N+Ess:  stáállun
    stáálu+v1+N+Par:  stáállud
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  stááluh
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [stáálui, stáˊlui]
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  stááluid
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  stááloid
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  stááluin
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  stáˊluiguin
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  stáˊluittáá

  Noun - jáámu: # ok LAAVU
    jáámu+N+Sg+Nom:  jááṃu
    jáámu+N+Sg+Gen:  jáámu
    jáámu+N+Sg+Acc:  jáámu
    jáámu+N+Sg+Ill:  jááṃun
    jáámu+N+Sg+Loc:  jáámust
    jáámu+N+Sg+Com:  jáámoin
    jáámu+N+Sg+Abe:  jáˊmuttáá
    jáámu+N+Ess:  jáámmun
    jáámu+N+Par:  jáámmud
    jáámu+N+Pl+Nom:  jáámuh
    jáámu+N+Pl+Gen: [jáámui, jáˊmui]
    jáámu+N+Pl+Acc:  jáámuid
    jáámu+N+Pl+Ill:  jáámoid
    jáámu+N+Pl+Loc:  jáámuin
    jáámu+N+Pl+Com:  jáˊmuiguin
    jáámu+N+Pl+Abe:  jáˊmuittáá

  Noun - láátu+v1: # ok LAAVU
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  láátu
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  lááđu
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  lááđu
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  láátun
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  lááđust
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  lááđoin
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊđuttáá
    láátu+v1+N+Ess:  lááttun
    láátu+v1+N+Par:  lááttud
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  lááđuh
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [lááđui, láˊđui]
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  lááđuid
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  lááđoid
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  lááđuin
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  láˊđuiguin
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊđuittáá

  Noun - pááru+v1: # ok LAAVU
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  pááṛu
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  pááru
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  pááru
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  pááṛun
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  páárust
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Com:  páároin
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊruttáá
    pááru+v1+N+Ess:  páárrun
    pááru+v1+N+Par:  páárrud
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  pááruh
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [páárui, páˊrui]
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  pááruid
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  páároid
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  pááruin
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Com:  páˊruiguin
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊruittáá

  Noun - máátu+v1: # ok LAAVU
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  máátu
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  mááđu 
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  máátun
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  mááđust 
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  mááđoin
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊđuttáá
    máátu+v1+N+Ess:  mááttun
    máátu+v1+N+Par:  mááttud
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  mááđuh 
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [mááđui, máˊđui]
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  mááđuid
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  mááđoid
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  mááđuin
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  máˊđuiguin
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊđuittáá

  Noun - tuálu: # ok LAAVU
    tuálu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáḷu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuálu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuálu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuáḷun
    tuálu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuálust
    tuálu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáloin
    tuálu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáˊluttáá
    tuálu+N+Ess:  tuállun
    tuálu+N+Par:  tuállud
    tuálu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáluh
    tuálu+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuálui, tuáˊlui]
    tuálu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáluid
    tuálu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáloid
    tuálu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáluin
    tuálu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáˊluiguin
    tuálu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáˊluittáá

  Noun - luámu: # ok LAAVU
    luámu+N+Sg+Nom:  luáṃu
    luámu+N+Sg+Gen:  luámu
    luámu+N+Sg+Acc:  luámu
    luámu+N+Sg+Ill:  luáṃun
    luámu+N+Sg+Loc:  luámust
    luámu+N+Sg+Com:  luámoin
    luámu+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊmuttáá
    luámu+N+Ess:  luámmun
    luámu+N+Par:  luámmud
    luámu+N+Pl+Nom:  luámuh
    luámu+N+Pl+Gen:  [luámui, luáˊmui]
    luámu+N+Pl+Acc:  luámuid
    luámu+N+Pl+Ill:  luámoid
    luámu+N+Pl+Loc:  luámuin
    luámu+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊmuiguin
    luámu+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊmuittáá

  Noun - tuámu: # ok LAAVU
    tuámu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáṃu
    tuámu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuámu
    tuámu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuámu
    tuámu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuáṃun
    tuámu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuámust
    tuámu+N+Sg+Com:  tuámoin
    tuámu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáˊmuttáá
    tuámu+N+Ess:  tuámmun
    tuámu+N+Par:  tuámmud
    tuámu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuámuh
    tuámu+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuámui, tuáˊmui]
    tuámu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuámuid
    tuámu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuámoid
    tuámu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuámuin
    tuámu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáˊmuiguin
    tuámu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáˊmuittáá

  Noun - tuáru: # ok LAAVU
    tuáru+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáṛu
    tuáru+N+Sg+Gen:  tuáru
    tuáru+N+Sg+Acc:  tuáru
    tuáru+N+Sg+Ill:  tuáṛun
    tuáru+N+Sg+Loc:  tuárust
    tuáru+N+Sg+Com:  tuároin
    tuáru+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáˊruttáá
    tuáru+N+Ess:  tuárrun
    tuáru+N+Par:  tuárrud
    tuáru+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáruh
    tuáru+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuárui, tuáˊrui]
    tuáru+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáruid
    tuáru+N+Pl+Ill:  tuároid
    tuáru+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáruin
    tuáru+N+Pl+Com:  tuáˊruiguin
    tuáru+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáˊruittáá

  Noun - vuáru+v1: # ok LAAVU
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáṛu
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáru
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáru
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáṛun
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárust
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Com:  vuároin
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊruttáá
    vuáru+v1+N+Ess:  vuárrun
    vuáru+v1+N+Par:  vuárrud
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáruh
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [vuárui, vuáˊrui]
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáruid
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  vuároid
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáruin
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊruiguin
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊruittáá

  Noun - puáđu+v1: # ok LAAVU
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  puáđ̣u
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  puáđu
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  puáđu
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  puáđ̣un
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  puáđust
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  puáđoin
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊđuttáá
    puáđu+v1+N+Ess:  puáđđun
    puáđu+v1+N+Par:  puáđđud
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  puáđuh
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [puáđui, puáˊđui]
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  puáđuid
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  puáđoid
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  puáđuin
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊđuiguin
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊđuittáá

  Noun - muátu+v1: # ok LAAVU
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  muátu
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  muáđu
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  muáđu
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  muátun
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  muáđust
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  muáđoin
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  muáˊđuttáá
    muátu+v1+N+Ess:  muáttun
    muátu+v1+N+Par:  muáttud
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  muáđuh
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [muáđui, muáˊđui]
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  muáđuid
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  muáđoid
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  muáđuin
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  muáˊđuiguin
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  muáˊđuittáá

  Noun - piätu: # ok LAAVU
    piätu+N+Sg+Nom:  piätu
    piätu+N+Sg+Gen:  piäđu
    piätu+N+Sg+Acc:  piäđu
    piätu+N+Sg+Ill:  piätun
    piätu+N+Sg+Loc:  piäđust
    piätu+N+Sg+Com:  piäđoin
    piätu+N+Sg+Abe:  piäˊđuttáá
    piätu+N+Ess:  piättun
    piätu+N+Par:  piättud
    piätu+N+Pl+Nom:  piäđuh
    piätu+N+Pl+Gen:  [piäđui, piäˊđui]
    piätu+N+Pl+Acc:  piäđuid
    piätu+N+Pl+Ill:  piäđoid
    piätu+N+Pl+Loc:  piäđuin
    piätu+N+Pl+Com:  piäˊđuiguin
    piätu+N+Pl+Abe:  piäˊđuittáá

  Noun - páájá:
    páájá+N+Sg+Nom:  pááj̣á
    páájá+N+Sg+Gen:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Acc:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Ill:  pááj̣án
    páájá+N+Sg+Loc:  páájást
    páájá+N+Sg+Com:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊjáttáá
    páájá+N+Ess:  pááiján
    páájá+N+Par: pááijád
    páájá+N+Pl+Nom:  páájáh
    páájá+N+Pl+Gen:  [páájái, páˊjái]
    páájá+N+Pl+Acc:  páájáid
    páájá+N+Pl+Ill:  páájáid
    páájá+N+Pl+Loc:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Pl+Com:  páˊjáiguin
    páájá+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊjáittáá

  Noun - čááná:
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom:  čááṇá
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill:  čááṇán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc:  čáánást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe:  čáˊnáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess:  čáánnán
    čááná+N+Par:  čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom:  [čáánáh, čáˊnáh]
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: [čáánái, čáˊnái]
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com:  čáˊnáiguin
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe:  čáˊnáittáá

  Noun - vaarâ:
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Nom: vaaṛâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaaṛân
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaarâst
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Com: vaaráin
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Abe: vaˊrâttáá
    vaarâ+N+Ess: vaarrân
    vaarâ+N+Par: vaarrâd
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaarah
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaarâi, vaˊrâi]
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaarâid
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaaráid
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaarâin
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Com: vaˊrâiguin
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Abe: vaˊrâittáá

  Noun - čääci: # ok  
    čääci+N+Sg+Nom:   čääci
    čääci+N+Sg+Gen:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Acc:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Ill:   čáácán
    čääci+N+Sg+Loc:   čääsist
    čääci+N+Sg+Com:   čassijn
    čääci+N+Sg+Abe:   čäˊsittáá
    čääci+N+Ess:      čääccin
    čääci+N+Par:      čääccid
    čääci+N+Pl+Nom:   čääsih
    čääci+N+Pl+Gen:  [čaasij, čaˊsij]
    čääci+N+Pl+Acc:   čaasijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Ill:   čassijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Loc:   čaasijn
    čääci+N+Pl+Com:   čaˊsijguin
    čääci+N+Pl+Abe:   čaˊsijttáá
